Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 1 Persons Employed by the Armed Forces of the United States and Other Federal Agencies

47-2-140.
Credit for transfer to a federal agency during a national emergency; retransfer to employment under retirement system; termination of federal employment.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, an employer contribution shall be made on the account of a member who is transferred to a federal agency during a national emergency, provided that the transfer is made pursuant to an official request to the member for his services, together with a request that the employer release the member to perform national emergency services; and provided, further, that termination of the employment with the federal agency is for the purpose of returning to employment under the retirement system or entering the armed forces of the United States. This subsection shall be applicable only if certified copies of the official requests shall be filed with the retirement system at the time of transfer.

Upon retransfer to employment under the retirement system, the member shall make a lump sum employee contribution through his employer to the retirement system for the period during which he was employed by the federal agency. Both this lump sum contribution and the employer contributions under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be the same as would have been contributed had the member remained in his former position and continued to make the same contributions as were made in the last month before his transfer to the federal agency. The employer contribution shall be paid from the expense fund established under Code Section 47-2-60.

Upon retransfer to employment under the retirement system and payment of the employee and employer contributions for the period during which he served in the federal agency, the member shall be treated, for purposes of receiving benefits under this chapter, as if he were employed under the retirement system during such time.

A member who leaves service with a federal agency under conditions other than those set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section shall upon written request be eligible for refund of contributions made by him up to the time of his transfer. No further employer contributions shall be made on the account of such a member after such termination of service.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as meaning that any individual affected thereby is in service until he returns to employment under the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 394, § 3.

47-2-141.
Employer contributions for transfer to federal agency; accumulated pension credits; effect of failure to return to state employment.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, an employer contribution shall be made to the account of any member who during a national emergency enters or in time of peace is drafted into the armed forces of the United States directly from state employment or from employment in a federal agency after having been transferred to such agency from state employment under Code Section 47-2-140. The contribution shall be made by the employer for the period during which the member served in the armed forces of the United States and in the same amount as would have been contributed by the employer had the member remained in employment under the retirement system without change in compensation during that period, provided that such contribution shall be made for not more than five years of such period. Such contribution shall be paid into the pension accumulation fund as provided in Code Section 47-2-55.

The employer contribution made on the member’s account shall entitle him to the accumulated pension credits for such period only if within one year of his discharge he returns to employment under the retirement system or with the federal agency to which he was transferred pursuant to Code Section 47-2-140. If the member fails to return to such federal or state employment within one year of his discharge, his benefits under the retirement system shall be limited to his accumulated contributions at the time of his original transfer from state employment or entry into the armed forces of the United States, in which case his accumulated contributions shall be refunded to him upon his written request, and no further employer contributions shall be made on his account after such one-year period.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as meaning that any individual affected thereby is in service until such person returns to state employment.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 394, § 4; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1297, § 1.

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

47-2-142.
[Repealed] Credit for prior service rendered by persons transferred under loan to a federal agency but ineligible for federal service retirement membership or who served overseas with the Red Cross during World War II.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 4; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1410, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1/SB 98; repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 19, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”